Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-1304. Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality shall maintain and make available to the public a list of Phase I consultants who meet the minimum qualifications for an environmental professional who undertakes a Phase I environmental site assessment, referred to as “all appropriate inquiry” under the Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, and the rules promulgated under the Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 1018, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

U.S. Code.

The Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act, Pub. L. No. 107-118, referred to in this section, is codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 9601, 9604, 9605, 9607, 9622, and 9628.

8-7-1305 — 8-7-1310. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, No. 827, § 240, the repeal of § 8-7-1305 by Acts 2007, No. 1018, § 1 supersedes the amendment of § 8-7-1305 by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 121.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, No. 827, § 240, the repeal of § 8-7-1306 by Acts 2007, No. 1018, § 1 supersedes the amendment of § 8-7-1306 by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 122.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, No. 827, § 240, the repeal of § 8-7-1307 by Acts 2007, No. 1018, § 1 supersedes the amendment of § 8-7-1307(a)(2) by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 123, and the amendment of § 8-7-1307(b)(3) and (4) by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 124.

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning applicability, certification categories, certification criteria and procedure, unlawful acts, disciplinary actions and suspension or revocation of certification, and rules and regulations and appeals and hearings, were repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1018, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

8-7-1305. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 121.

8-7-1306. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 122.

8-7-1307. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 827, §§
123, 124.

8-7-1308. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1.

8-7-1309. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1.

8-7-1310. Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1.

8-7-1311. Fees.

Under rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Division of Environmental Quality may assess fees to Phase I consultants who apply to be placed on the list maintained under § 8-7-1304.

Fees shall be reasonable and appropriate and subject to periodic review.

All fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited into the Hazardous Waste Permit Fund, § 19-6-434.

Fees collected under this subchapter shall be used for the purposes of administering this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2141, § 1; 2007, No. 1018, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 681; 2019, No. 910, § 2840.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “participating contractors and” following “fees to” and added “who apply to be placed on the list maintained under § 8-7-1304.”

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1).

Subchapter 14
— Controlled Substances Contaminated Property Cleanup Act

Cross References.

Guidelines for cleanup of clandestine methamphetamine labs, §
20-7-132.

Methamphetamine-contaminated motor vehicles, §
5-64-510.

Property subject to forfeiture, §
5-64-505.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-1401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Controlled Substances Contaminated Property Cleanup Act”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1.

8-7-1402. Professional cleanup of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall:

Establish and administer a certification program to:

Certify contractors who choose to undertake the inspection, sampling, remediation, and removal of contaminated materials from property contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances; and

Require as a condition of certification that the contractors demonstrate that they have the qualifications required to undertake inspection, sampling, remediation, and removal of contaminated materials from property contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances;

Establish standards for the remediation of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances;

Make the certification program rules and the remediation standards available to law enforcement officials and the public:

On the division's website; and

In hard copy upon request to the division; and

Annually review and update the remediation standards.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the certification program for contractors in the inspection, sampling, remediation, and removal of contaminated materials from property contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances.

The rules promulgated by the commission under this section shall include without limitation:

Application forms for certification;

Continuing education requirements;

Professional and technical standards for certification;

Renewals of certification;

Procedures for revocation and other actions that affect the status of certification; and

Reasonable fees.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 31; 2019, No. 910, §§
2841, 2842.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 inserted “the” preceding “qualifications” in (a)(1)(B); deleted former (a)(2); redesignated former (a)(3) through (a)(5) as (a)(2) through (a)(4); and deleted “By March 1, 2008” from the beginning of (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “division’s” for “department’s” in (a)(4)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(4)(B).

8-7-1403. Reporting of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances.

If a private property owner finds an abandoned laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances on his or her property and there has been no active on-site law enforcement involvement, the private property owner shall notify local law enforcement for proper removal of contaminated material.

If a property owner finds or becomes aware of evidence of a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances on his or her property, the property owner shall have the property inspected in accordance with the guidelines established by the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter by a contractor certified by the division under § 8-7-1402.

If the contractor selected by the property owner under subdivision (b)(1) of this section verifies that a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances has been on the property, the contractor shall notify the division, and the division shall place the property on the contaminated properties list required under § 8-7-1404.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
2843.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and twice in (b)(2).

8-7-1404. Recordkeeping required.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall maintain records concerning properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances.

The division shall:

Create a list of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances;

Place a contaminated property on the contaminated properties list;

Not determine that a property has been adequately remediated unless:

The inspection, sampling, remediation, and removal of contaminated materials is performed:

By or under the direction and responsible charge of an individual who has obtained a certification under the rules established by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under this subchapter; or

By an employee of a public agency that has the responsibility of regulatory enforcement, emergency response, the protection of public health and welfare, or the protection of the environment while the employee is acting in the course of that employment; and

The property has met the remediation standards developed by the division;

Post the results of a cleanup on the division's website for ten (10) working days after the division determines that the property has been adequately remediated.

After the ten (10) working days of posting required under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section, the division shall remove from the division's website the formerly contaminated property and the results of the cleanup; and

Remove a property from the list when the division finds that the property has been adequately remediated.

The division shall make the list of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances available to law enforcement officials and to the public:

On the division's website; and

In hard copy upon request to the division.

The division shall keep hard copies of the information required under this section until the division has removed the property from the list of properties contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2844-2848.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment redesignated (b)(3)(A)(i), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “The Division of Environmental Quality” for “By May 1, 2008, the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

8-7-1405. Notice — Cleanup — Residual contamination.

If a law enforcement officer discovers a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances or arrests a person for having equipment used in manufacturing controlled substances on any real property, the law enforcement officer shall at the time of the discovery or arrest deliver a copy of the notice of removal required under subsection (d) of this section to:

The owner of the real property if the owner is present at the time of the discovery or arrest;

The on-site manager if the on-site manager is present at the time of the discovery or arrest;

An on-site drop box if available; or

In the case of a tenant-owner unit in a space-rental mobile home or a recreational vehicle park to:

The occupant if the occupant is on site at the time of delivery; or

The on-site park landlord if the on-site park landlord is present at the time of delivery.

If neither the owner nor the on-site manager of a property used in manufacturing controlled substances is on the property at the time of the discovery of or arrest regarding a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances, the law enforcement officer shall make every reasonable effort to obtain the necessary contact information concerning the owner from the tenant, property manager, or neighbors.

Within five (5) business days after the discovery of or arrest regarding a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances, the law enforcement officer shall send the notice of removal required under subsection (d) of this section by certified mail and regular mail to the owner of the property and the owner's on-site manager or, in the case of a space-rental mobile home or a recreational vehicle park, to the park landlord.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall cooperate with the Arkansas Crime Information Center to create a computer link that will allow the center to transfer to the division information from the National Clandestine Laboratory Seizure Report required under 28 C.F.R. Part 23 that is relevant to the notice of removal required under subsection (d) of this section.

At the time a law enforcement officer removes the gross contamination from property used as a laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances, the law enforcement officer shall order the removal of all persons from the residually contaminated portion of the property or dwelling unit or, in the case of a space-rental mobile home or a recreational vehicle park, from the unit located on the property.

After the law enforcement officer removes all persons under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the law enforcement officer shall affix the notice of removal required under subsection (d) of this section in a conspicuous place on the property or, in the case of a space-rental mobile home or a recreational vehicle park, on the unit located on the property.

The notice of removal under this section shall be in writing and shall contain all of the following:

The word “WARNING” in large bold type at the top and the bottom of the notice;

The date of the seizure and removal;

The address or location of the property, including the identification of any dwelling unit, room number, apartment number, or vehicle number;

The name of the law enforcement agency that seized the laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances and the law enforcement agency's contact telephone number;

A list of telephone numbers and contact information for all local and state agencies involved in the process of remediation;

The contact numbers for local and state agencies associated with the cleanup of laboratories for the manufacture of controlled substances; and

A statement that:

A laboratory for the manufacture of controlled substances was discovered on the property;

Chemicals or equipment, or both, that were used in the manufacture of controlled substances were seized at the property;

Hazardous substances, toxic chemicals, or other waste products may still be present on the property or, in the case of a space-rental mobile home or a recreational vehicle park, in the unit located on the property;

Failure to comply with this section is a violation of the division's rules pertaining to the cleanup of laboratories for the manufacture of controlled substances;

Disturbing the notice of removal posted on the property is a violation of the division's rules concerning the cleanup of laboratories for the manufacture of controlled substances; and

The owner of the property is responsible for remediating the residually contaminated portion of the property in compliance with the division's rules concerning the cleanup of laboratories for the manufacture of controlled substances.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 11; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2849-2852.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (d)(7)(D)(ii), and made a minor stylistic change in (d)(7)(D)(ii)

(a)

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(3); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-1406. Remediated property.

After property contaminated through the manufacture of controlled substances is remediated and the property owner receives official notification from the Division of Environmental Quality, no person, including the property owner, landlord, and real estate agent, is required to report or otherwise disclose the past contamination.

Unless retention is mandated by federal law, the division shall destroy all copies of information required to be kept under this subchapter that refer to a specific property location once the property is officially removed from the contaminated properties list.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2853.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-7-1407. Penalties.

Any person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of violating § 8-7-1405(d)(7)(D) or § 8-7-1405(d)(7)(E) is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 864, § 1.